Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for knowingly requesting ambulance service when no reasonable need exists, §

16-10-29

.

Required equipment for emergency vehicles, §

40-8-90

et seq.

31-11-1.
Findings; declaration of policy.

The General Assembly finds and determines:

That the furnishing of emergency medical services is a matter of substantial importance to the people of this state;

That the cost and quality of emergency medical services are matters within the public interest;

That it is highly desirable for the state to participate in emergency medical systems communications programs established pursuant to Public Law 93-154, entitled the Emergency Medical Services Systems Act of 1973;

That the administration of an emergency medical systems communications program should be the responsibility of the Department of Public Health, acting upon the recommendations of the local entity which coordinates the program; all ambulance services shall be a part of this system even if this system is the 9-1-1 emergency telephone number;

That an emergency medical systems communications program in a health district should be operated as economically and efficiently as possible to serve the public welfare and, to achieve this goal, should involve the designation of geographical territories to be serviced by participating ambulance providers and should involve an economic and efficient procedure to distribute emergency calls among participating ambulance providers serving the same health district; and

Any first responder falls under the department’s rules and regulations governing ambulances and can transport only in life-threatening situations or by orders of a licensed physician or when a licensed ambulance cannot respond.

The General Assembly therefore declares that, in the exercise of the sovereign powers of the state to safeguard and protect the public health and general well-being of its citizens, it is the public policy of this state to encourage, foster, and promote emergency medical systems communications programs and that such programs shall be accomplished in a manner that is coordinated, orderly, economical, and without unnecessary duplication of services and facilities.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3100, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1068, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 3/HB 470; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Emergency telephone number “9-1-1” system, §

46-5-120

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, the subsection (a) designation preceding paragraph (a)(4) was deleted.

Editor’s notes.

The Emergency Medical Services Systems Act of 1973, P.L. 93-154, referred to in paragraph (a)(3), was repealed by P.L. 99-117 and P.L. 99-129. The Georgia Emergency Medical Systems Communication Program, however, was established pursuant to that Act prior to its repeal. Therefore, the reference in this Code section to that Act is being retained for historical purposes.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Air ambulance” means any rotary-wing aircraft used or intended to be used for hire for transportation of sick or injured persons who may need medical attention during transport.

(1.1)

“Air ambulance service” means the for-hire providing of emergency care and transportation by means of an air ambulance for an injured or sick person to or from a place where medical or hospital care is furnished.

(1.2)

“Ambulance” means a motor vehicle that is specially constructed and equipped or an air ambulance and is intended to be used for the emergency transportation of patients, including dual purpose police patrol cars and funeral coaches or hearses which otherwise comply with the provisions of this chapter.

“Ambulance attendant” means a person responsible for the care of patients being transported in an ambulance.

“Ambulance provider” means an agency or company providing ambulance service which is operating under a valid license from the Emergency Health Section of the Department of Public Health.

“Ambulance service” means:

The providing of emergency care and transportation on the public streets and highways of this state for a wounded, injured, sick, invalid, or incapacitated human being to or from a place where medical or hospital care is furnished;

The provision of any air ambulance service; or

The provision of services specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph.

“Cardiac technician” means a person who, having been trained and certified as an emergency medical technician and having completed additional training in advanced cardiac life support techniques in a training course approved by the department, is so certified by the Composite State Board of Medical Examiners, now known as the Georgia Composite Medical Board, prior to January 1, 2002, or the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Public Health for these purposes) on and after January 1, 2002.

“Composite board” means the Georgia Composite Medical Board.

(6.1)

“Department” means the Department of Public Health.

“Emergency medical services system” means a system which provides for the arrangement of personnel, facilities, and equipment for the effective and coordinated delivery in an appropriate geographical area of health care services under emergency conditions, occurring either as a result of the patient’s condition or as a result of natural disasters or similar situations, and which is administered by a public or nonprofit private entity which has the authority and the resources to provide effective administration of the system.

“Emergency Medical Systems Communications Program” (EMSC Program) means any program established pursuant to Public Law 93-154, entitled the Emergency Medical Services Systems Act of 1973, which serves as a central communications system to coordinate the personnel, facilities, and equipment of an emergency medical services system and which:

Utilizes emergency medical telephonic screening;

Utilizes a publicized emergency telephone number; and

Has direct communication connections and interconnections with the personnel, facilities, and equipment of an emergency medical services system.

“Emergency medical technician” means a person who has been certified by the department after having successfully completed an emergency medical care training program approved by the department.

“First responder” means any person or agency who provides on-site care until the arrival of a duly licensed ambulance service.

“Health districts” means the geographical districts designated by the department in accord with Code Section 31-3-15.

“Invalid car” means a motor vehicle not used for emergency purposes but used only to transport persons who are convalescent, sick, or otherwise nonambulatory.

“License” when issued to an ambulance service signifies that its facilities and operations comply with this chapter and the rules and regulations issued by the department hereunder.

“License officer” means the commissioner of public health or his designee.

“Local coordinating entity” means the public or nonprofit private entity designated by the Board of Public Health or its designee to administer and coordinate the EMSC Program in a health district established in accord with Code Section 31-3-15.

“Paramedic” means any person who has been certified by the composite board before January 1, 2002, or by the department on or after January 1, 2002, as having been trained in emergency care techniques in a paramedic training course approved by the department.

(16.1)

“Paramedic clinical preceptor” means a Georgia certified paramedic with a minimum of two years of emergency medical services experience who meets the standard requirements for paramedic preceptor training as established by the department.

“Patient” means an individual who is sick, injured, wounded, or otherwise incapacitated or helpless.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, company, group of individuals acting together for a common purpose, or organization of any kind, including any governmental agency other than of the United States.

“Provisional license” when issued to an ambulance service means a license issued on a conditional basis to allow a newly established ambulance service a period of 30 days to demonstrate that its facilities and operations comply with this chapter and rules and regulations issued by the department under this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3101, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1068, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1782, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-5, 1-6, 1-35/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 10/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, §§ 5-15, 6-4, 6-5/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

The Emergency Medical Services Systems Act of 1973, P.L. 93-154, referred to in paragraph (8), was repealed by P.L. 99-117 and P.L. 99-129. The Georgia Emergency Medical Systems Communications Program, however, was established pursuant to that Act prior to its repeal. Therefore, the reference in this Code section to that Act is being retained for historical purposes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.20.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-3.
Recommendations by local coordinating entity as to administration of EMSC Program; hearing and appeal.

The Board of Public Health shall have the authority on behalf of the state to designate and contract with a public or nonprofit local entity to coordinate and administer the EMSC Program for each health district designated by the Department of Public Health. The local coordinating entity thus designated shall be responsible for recommending to the board or its designee the manner in which the EMSC Program is to be conducted. In making its recommendations, the local coordinating entity shall give priority to making the EMSC Program function as efficiently and economically as possible. Each licensed ambulance provider in the health district shall have the opportunity to participate in the EMSC Program.

The local coordinating entity shall request from each licensed ambulance provider in its health district a written description of the territory in which it can respond to emergency calls, based upon the provider’s average response time from its base location within such territory; and such written description shall be due within ten days of the request by the local coordinating entity.

After receipt of the written descriptions of territory in which the ambulance providers propose to respond to emergency calls, the local coordinating entity shall within ten days recommend in writing to the board or its designee the territories within the health district to be serviced by the ambulance providers; and at this same time the local coordinating entity shall also recommend the method for distributing emergency calls among the providers, based primarily on the considerations of economy, efficiency, and benefit to the public welfare. The recommendation of the local coordinating entity shall be forwarded immediately to the board or its designee for approval or modification of the territorial zones and method of distributing calls among ambulance providers participating in the EMSC Program in the health district.

The board, or its designee, is empowered to conduct a hearing into the recommendations made by the local coordinating entity, and such hearing shall be conducted according to the procedures set forth in Code Section 31-5-2.

The recommendations of the local coordinating entity shall not be modified unless the board or its designee shall find, after a hearing, that the determination of the district health director is not consistent with operation of the EMSC Program in an efficient, economical manner that benefits the public welfare. The decision of the board or its designee shall be rendered as soon as possible and shall be final and conclusive concerning the operation of the EMSC Program; and appeal from such decision shall be pursuant to Code Section 31-5-3.

The local coordinating entity shall begin administering the EMSC Program in accord with the decision by the board or its designee immediately after the decision by the board or its designee regarding the approval or modification of the recommendations made by the local coordinating entity; and the EMSC Program shall be operated in such manner pending the resolution of any appeals filed pursuant to Code Section 31-5-3.

This Code section shall not apply to air ambulances or air ambulance services.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3116, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1068, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-4, 1-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, §§ 6-3, 6-4/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-4.
Supervision and modifications of EMSC Program.

The board or its designee shall exercise continuing supervision over the operations of the EMSC Program in each health district and shall make all necessary modifications in accord with the procedures set forth in Code Section 31-11-3.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3117, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1068, § 4.

31-11-5.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the protection of the public health:

Prescribing reasonable health, sanitation, and safety standards for transporting patients in ambulances;

Prescribing reasonable conditions under which ambulance attendants are required;

Establishing criteria for the training of ambulance attendants; and

The emergency medical technician course is to be offered at area hospitals and area technical vocational schools in conjunction with their emergency patient care and personnel training programs.

Nothing in this Code section shall authorize the department to adopt and promulgate rules or regulations which shall prevent the continued use of dual purpose funeral coaches or hearses currently being used as ambulances if the vehicles otherwise conform in all respects to the requirements of Code Section 31-11-34, except for their size and shape.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 3.

31-11-6.
Records.

Records of each ambulance trip shall be made by the ambulance service in a manner and on such forms as may be prescribed by the department through regulations. Such records shall be available for inspection by the department at any time, and a summary of ambulance service activities shall be prepared on specific cases and furnished to the department upon request.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3108, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1.

31-11-7.
Exercise of emergency vehicle privileges by ambulance drivers.

The driver of an ambulance on the public streets, highways, and private access roads of this state, when responding to an emergency call or while transporting a patient, is authorized to operate the ambulance as an emergency vehicle pursuant to Code Section 40-6-6.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3109, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 4.

Cross references.

Yielding of right of way to authorized emergency vehicles, §

40-6-74

.

Duty of pedestrians to yield right of way to authorized vehicles, §

40-6-99

.

31-11-8.
Liability of persons rendering emergency care; liability of physicians advising ambulance service pursuant to Code Section 31-11-50; limitation to gratuitous services.

Any person, including agents and employees, who is licensed to furnish ambulance service and who in good faith renders emergency care to a person who is a victim of an accident or emergency shall not be liable for any civil damages to such victim as a result of any act or omission by such person in rendering such emergency care to such victim.

A physician shall not be civilly liable for damages resulting from that physician’s acting as medical adviser to an ambulance service, pursuant to Code Section 31-11-50, if those damages are not a result of that physician’s willful and wanton negligence.

The immunity provided in this Code section shall apply only to those persons who perform the aforesaid emergency services for no remuneration.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3114, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 692, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Statement of emergency vehicle driver’s duty of care with regard to other drivers and pedestrians in operation of vehicle, §§

40-6-74

,

40-6-99

.

Liability of persons rendering emergency care generally, §

51-1-29

.

Law reviews.

For article surveying judicial and legislative developments in Georgia’s tort laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 229 (1979).

For comment, “Good Samaritan Laws — Legal Disarray: An Update,” see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 1439 (1987).

For annual survey on local government law, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2013).

31-11-9.
Enforcement; inspections.

The department and its duly authorized agents are authorized to enforce compliance with this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title and, in connection therewith during the reasonable business hours of the day, to enter upon and inspect in a reasonable manner the premises of persons providing ambulance service. All inspections under this Code section shall be in compliance with the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title. The department is also authorized to enforce compliance with this chapter, including but not limited to compliance with the EMSC Program and furnishing of emergency services within designated territories, by imposing fines in the same manner as provided in paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of Code Section 31-2-8; this enforcement action shall be a contested case under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3110, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1997, p. 454, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-16/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-10.
Establishment of fees and regulations by municipalities.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting or preventing a municipality from fixing, charging, or assessing any license fee or registration fee on any business or profession covered by this chapter or upon any related profession or any person engaged in any profession governed by this chapter or collecting any fee so imposed or from establishing additional regulations regarding ambulance service.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 2.

31-11-11.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to the following:

An ambulance or ambulance service operated by an agency of the United States government;

A vehicle or aircraft that is operated by a person who is not licensed to furnish ambulance service which is rendering assistance temporarily in the case of a major catastrophe or emergency because the licensed ambulance services of the state are insufficient or unable to meet the demands thereof;

An ambulance which is operated from a location outside of the state in order to transport patients from without the state’s limits to locations within the state; or

An invalid car or the operator thereof, except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 31-11-30.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3111, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 800, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 5.

31-11-12.
Contracts between emergency service providers and pharmacies for furnishing dangerous drugs and controlled substances.

Medical directors of licensed ambulance services, first responders, or neonatal services are authorized to contract with licensed pharmacies to furnish dangerous drugs and controlled substances for the vehicles of their particular services.
Such dangerous drugs and controlled substances shall be furnished, secured, and stored in the manner provided for in Code Section 26-4-116.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1307, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 31.